Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 12. Miscellaneous Provisions

§ 3310.
Fees.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees when a document described in this section is delivered to the Office of the Secretary of State for filing:

Statement of authority $ 125.00 (2) Statement of denial No fee (3) Statement of dissociation No fee (4) Statement of dissolution No fee (5) Statement of merger $ 50.00 (6) Statement of qualification $ 75.00 (7) Statement of foreign qualification $ 100.00 (8) Amendment $ 25.00 (9) Cancellation $ 5.00 (10) Annual report of domestic limited liability partnership $ 15.00 (11) Annual report of foreign limited liability partnership $ 100.00 (12) Reinstatement $ 25.00 (13) Statement of change of designated agent or designated office, or both $ 25.00, not to exceed $1,000.00 per filer per calen- dar year (14) Application for certificate of good standing $ 25.00 (15) Any other document permitted or required to be filed by this chapter $ 20.00

Click to view

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees:

$ 25.00 each time process is served on the Secretary under this chapter. The party to a proceeding causing service of process is entitled to recover this fee as costs if he or she prevails in the proceeding.

$ 25.00 for the certificate certifying the copy of any filed document related to a partnership, limited liability partnership, or a foreign limited liability partnership.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2003, No. 70

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. March 1, 2004;

2013, No. 72

, § 7.

§ 3311.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 3312.
Applicability.

Before January 1, 1999, this chapter governs only a partnership formed:

after the effective date of this chapter, except a partnership that is continuing the business of a dissolved partnership under section 1333 of this title; and

before the effective date of this chapter, that elects, as provided by subsection (c) of this section, to be governed by this chapter.

On and after January 1, 1999, this chapter governs all partnerships.

Before January 1, 1999, a partnership voluntarily may elect, in the manner provided in its partnership agreement or by law for amending the partnership agreement, to be governed by this chapter. The provisions of this chapter relating to the liability of the partnership’s partners to third parties apply to limit those partners’ liability to a third party who had done business with the partnership within one year before the partnership’s election to be governed by this chapter, only if the third party knows or has received a notification of the partnership’s election to be governed by this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 3313.
Savings clause.

The enactment of this chapter does not affect an action or proceeding commenced or right accrued before this chapter takes effect.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.